Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8 Medical Assistance
40-8-19.
Rates of payment to nursing facilities.

Rate reform.

The rates to be paid by the state to nursing facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 17 of title 23, and certified to participate in Title XIX of the Social Security Act for services rendered to Medicaid-eligible residents, shall be reasonable and adequate to meet the costs that must be incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(13). The executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) shall promulgate or modify the principles of reimbursement for nursing facilities in effect as of July 1, 2011, to be consistent with the provisions of this section and Title XIX, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., of the Social Security Act.

The executive office shall review the current methodology for providing Medicaid payments to nursing facilities, including other long-term-care services providers, and is authorized to modify the principles of reimbursement to replace the current cost-based methodology rates with rates based on a price-based methodology to be paid to all facilities with recognition of the acuity of patients and the relative Medicaid occupancy, and to include the following elements to be developed by the executive office:

A direct-care rate adjusted for resident acuity;

An indirect-care rate comprised of a base per diem for all facilities;

Revision of rates as necessary based on increases in direct and indirect costs beginning October 2024 utilizing data from the most recent finalized year of facility cost report. The per diem rate components deferred in subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be adjusted accordingly to reflect changes in direct and indirect care costs since the previous rate review;

Application of a fair-rental value system;

Application of a pass-through system; and

Adjustment of rates by the change in a recognized national nursing home inflation index to be applied on October 1 of each year, beginning October 1, 2012. This adjustment will not occur on October 1, 2013, October 1, 2014, or October 1, 2015, but will occur on April 1, 2015. The adjustment of rates will also not occur on October 1, 2017, October 1, 2018, October 1, 2019, and October 2022. Effective July 1, 2018, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2017, both fee-for-service and managed care, will be increased by one and one-half percent (1.5%) and further increased by one percent (1%) on October 1, 2018, and further increased by one percent (1%) on October 1, 2019. Effective October 1, 2022, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2021, both fee-for-service and managed care, will be increased by three percent (3%). In addition to the annual nursing home inflation index adjustment, there shall be a base rate staffing adjustment of one-half percent (0.5%) on October 1, 2021, one percent (1.0%) on October 1, 2022, and one and one-half percent (1.5%) on October 1, 2023. The inflation index shall be applied without regard for the transition factors in subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2). For purposes of October 1, 2016, adjustment only, any rate increase that results from application of the inflation index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) shall be dedicated to increase compensation for direct-care workers in the following manner: Not less than 85% of this aggregate amount shall be expended to fund an increase in wages, benefits, or related employer costs of direct-care staff of nursing homes. For purposes of this section, direct-care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs), certified nursing assistants (CNAs), certified medical technicians, housekeeping staff, laundry staff, dietary staff, or other similar employees providing direct-care services; provided, however, that this definition of direct-care staff shall not include: (i) RNs and LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees” under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or (ii) CNAs, certified medical technicians, RNs, or LPNs who are contracted, or subcontracted, through a third-party vendor or staffing agency. By July 31, 2017, nursing facilities shall submit to the secretary, or designee, a certification that they have complied with the provisions of this subsection (a)(2)(vi) with respect to the inflation index applied on October 1, 2016. Any facility that does not comply with the terms of such certification shall be subjected to a clawback, paid by the nursing facility to the state, in the amount of increased reimbursement subject to this provision that was not expended in compliance with that certification.

Commencing on October 1, 2021, eighty percent (80%) of any rate increase that results from application of the inflation index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the following manner on October 1, of each year.

For purposes of this subsection, compensation increases shall include base salary or hourly wage increases, benefits, other compensation, and associated payroll tax increases for eligible direct-care workers. This application of the inflation index shall apply for Medicaid reimbursement in nursing facilities for both managed care and fee-for-service. For purposes of this subsection, direct-care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs), certified nursing assistants (CNAs), certified medication technicians, licensed physical therapists, licensed occupational therapists, licensed speech-language pathologists, mental health workers who are also certified nurse assistants, physical therapist assistants, housekeeping staff, laundry staff, dietary staff or other similar employees providing direct-care services; provided, however that this definition of direct-care staff shall not include:

RNs and LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees” under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or

CNAs, certified medication technicians, RNs or LPNs who are contracted or subcontracted through a third-party vendor or staffing agency.

By July 31, 2021, and July 31 of each year thereafter, nursing facilities shall submit to the secretary or designee a certification that they have complied with the provisions of subsection (a)(3) of this section with respect to the inflation index applied on October 1. The executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall create the certification form nursing facilities must complete with information on how each individual eligible employee’s compensation increased, including information regarding hourly wages prior to the increase and after the compensation increase, hours paid after the compensation increase, and associated increased payroll taxes. A collective bargaining agreement can be used in lieu of the certification form for represented employees. All data reported on the compliance form is subject to review and audit by EOHHS. The audits may include field or desk audits, and facilities may be required to provide additional supporting documents including, but not limited to, payroll records.

Any facility that does not comply with the terms of certification shall be subjected to a clawback and twenty-five percent (25%) penalty of the unspent or impermissibly spent funds, paid by the nursing facility to the state, in the amount of increased reimbursement subject to this provision that was not expended in compliance with that certification.

In any calendar year where no inflationary index is applied, eighty percent (80%) of the base rate staffing adjustment in that calendar year pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(vi) of this section shall be dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the manner referenced in subsections (a)(3)(i), (a)(3)(i)(A), and (a)(3)(i)(B) of this section.

Transition to full implementation of rate reform. For no less than four (4) years after the initial application of the price-based methodology described in subsection (a)(2) to payment rates, the executive office of health and human services shall implement a transition plan to moderate the impact of the rate reform on individual nursing facilities. The transition shall include the following components:

No nursing facility shall receive reimbursement for direct-care costs that is less than the rate of reimbursement for direct-care costs received under the methodology in effect at the time of passage of this act; for the year beginning October 1, 2017, the reimbursement for direct-care costs under this provision will be phased out in twenty-five-percent (25%) increments each year until October 1, 2021, when the reimbursement will no longer be in effect; and

No facility shall lose or gain more than five dollars ($5.00) in its total, per diem rate the first year of the transition. An adjustment to the per diem loss or gain may be phased out by twenty-five percent (25%) each year; except, however, for the years beginning October 1, 2015, there shall be no adjustment to the per diem gain or loss, but the phase out shall resume thereafter; and

The transition plan and/or period may be modified upon full implementation of facility per diem rate increases for quality of care-related measures. Said modifications shall be submitted in a report to the general assembly at least six (6) months prior to implementation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the twelve-month (12) period beginning July 1, 2015, Medicaid payment rates for nursing facilities established pursuant to this section shall not exceed ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rates in effect on April 1, 2015. Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, nothing in this provision shall require the executive office to restore the rates to those in effect on April 1, 2015, at the end of this twelve-month (12) period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 37, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 8; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 11; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 5; P.L. 2021, ch. 23, § 2, effective May 27, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 24, § 2, effective May 27, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

40-8-19.1.
Nursing facility financial oversight.

On an annual basis, every licensed nursing facility participating in the medical assistance program shall file a financial statement or other financial information acceptable to the department with its annual cost report (BM-64) for the time period covered by the cost report that would provide sufficient information for the department to assess the facility’s financial status.

The department shall, by regulation:

Develop, in consultation with the department of health, criteria for the financial statements or financial information to be submitted in lieu of the financial statement as required in subsection (a);

Develop criteria for reviewing the financial statement or financial information submitted and assessing the financial status of facilities to determine if they have sufficient resources to meet operational and financial expenses and to comply with resident care and facility standards; and

Establish a set of indicators or criteria that would indicate if a facility’s financial status is marginal of if a facility is having severe financial difficulties. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to:

Significant operating losses for two (2) successive years;

Frequent requests for advance on Medicaid reimbursements;

Unfavorable working capital ratios of assets to liabilities;

High proportion of accounts receivable more than ninety (90) days’ old;

Increasing accounts payable, unpaid taxes, and/or payroll-related costs;

Minimal or decreasing equity and/or reserves;

High levels of debt and high borrowing costs.

Whenever a facility’s financial status is determined to be marginal or to have severe financial difficulties, the department shall notify the director of the department of health.

Special rate appeal pursuant to §

23-17-12.7

. The department shall file a state plan amendment with the United States Department of Health and Human Services to modify the principles of reimbursement for nursing facilities, to be effective on October 1, 2005, or as soon thereafter as is authorized by an approved state plan amendment, to assign a special prospective appeal rate for any facility for which, pursuant to §

23-17-12.6

, the department of health has appointed an independent quality monitor; the department of health has required to engage an independent quality consultant or temporary manager; and/or the department of health pursuant to §

23-17-12.7

has been required to develop and implement a plan of correction and remediation to address concerns regarding resident care and coincident financial solvency. The special prospective appeal rate shall be assigned for a duration of not less than six (6) months, shall be based upon the additional cost of the independent quality monitor, independent quality consultant, or temporary manager, as the case may be, or the approved spending plan set forth in the plan of correction and remediation, and subject to review-of-cost report, and subsequent extension at the discretion of the department, at six-month (6) intervals for a maximum of eighteen (18) months thereafter. In calculating the prospective per diem, the department shall disregard the cost center ceilings for the direct labor and other operating expense cost centers. The department shall recoup any funds specified in the spending plan that have not been expended.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 156, § 5; P.L. 2005, ch. 248, § 5.

40-8-19.2.
Nursing Facility Incentive Program (NFIP).

The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized to seek the federal authority required to implement a nursing facility incentive program (NFIP). The NFIP shall provide the participating licensed nursing facilities the ability to obtain certain payments for achieving performance goals established by the secretary. NFIP payments shall commence no earlier than July 1, 2016.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 11.

40-8-20.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 20, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 41, § 2, effective October 1, 2005.

40-8-20.1.
Prospective rate increments.

The department may consider the granting of a prospective rate that reflects demonstrated cost increases in excess of the rate that has been established by the application of the percentage increase. In order to qualify for the rate increment, demonstrated increased costs must be the result of:

Demonstrated errors made during the rate-determination process;

Significant increases in operating costs resulting from the implementation of new or additional programs, services, or staff specifically mandated by the Rhode Island department of health;

Significant increases in operating costs resulting from capital renovations, expansion, or replacement required for compliance with fire safety codes and/or certification requirements of the Rhode Island department of health, as well as increased energy costs that the facility can demonstrate are a result of the facility having expended funds for heating, lighting, hot water, and similar costs associated with the consumption of energy provided by public utilities;

Significant increases in workers’ compensation and/or health insurance premiums that cannot be accommodated within the nursing facility’s assigned aggregate per diem rate, if cost justified; provided, that the assigned per diem rate in the labor- and payroll-related-expenses cost center does not exceed two percent (2%) of the cost center ceiling; or

Extraordinary circumstances, including, but not limited to, acts of God, and inordinate increases in energy costs (e.g., federal BTU tax, regional or national energy crisis). Inordinate increases in energy costs will be immediately reflected in increased rates above the energy cost center ceiling maximum. Provided, however, that the increases will be rescinded immediately upon cessation of the extraordinary circumstance. All requests for rate increments shall be limited to one request per nursing facility for the factors set forth in subsections (2) and (3); provided, additional requests involving a per diem increase in excess of one percent of the nursing facility’s previously assigned aggregate per diem rate shall also be reviewed. Before a nursing facility shall be permitted to file for a rate increment, increases in operating costs set forth in subsections (2) and (3) must have been incurred for a period of not less than three (3) months in order to establish proof of the increase. Rate adjustments granted as a result of a request filed within one hundred twenty (120) days after the costs were first incurred shall be made effective retroactively to the date the costs were actually incurred; provided, further, any adjustments granted as a result of requests filed more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the costs were first incurred will be effective on the first day of the month following the filing of the request.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 12, § 1.

40-8-20.2.
Best energy practices for licensed nursing facilities — Energy conservation retention credit.

In order to reduce overall energy consumption and to slow the rate of the growth in state Medicaid expenditures, the state of Rhode Island shall adopt an energy conservation retention credit for licensed nursing facilities that meet the criteria set forth herein. Every licensed nursing facility participating in the Medicaid medical assistance program that: (1) Expends funds for energy conservation measures and the use of renewable fuels, energy sources, and so-called “green” sources of energy that result in a reduction of energy consumption; and (2) Which methods the facility can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, result in the facility’s “pass through” per diem cost being reduced in the next base year in comparison to the immediately preceding base year, shall be permitted to retain the difference in the previous per diem and the new per diem for a period of up to twenty-four (24) months. Provided, that such retained funds shall be utilized by the nursing facility solely for either: (1) Costs directly associated with employing labor at the facility; or (2) To pay down any debt of the nursing facility incurred directly through the purchases of energy saving, conservation, and renewable energy or so-called “green” devices.

The department of human services shall convene a working group of interested parties, including, but not limited to, public utilities, provider trades associations, labor unions representing nursing home employees, and environmental advocates, to establish best energy practices for this industry.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 12, § 2.

40-8-21.
Appeals process.

Any provider that is not in agreement, after being provided an exit-audit conference or rate-appeal conference, with a final rate of reimbursement assigned as a result of an audit for its base year, or with the application of the principles of reimbursement for an applicable year, may within fifteen (15) days from the date of notification of audit results or rate assignment, file a written request with the department for a review of the computation of the assigned rate. The foregoing right of appeal shall also apply to demonstrated errors made during the rate determination process.

A review conference will be conducted within fifteen (15) days from the date of receipt of the written request by a designee assigned by the director of the department of human services. As a result of the review conference, the designee may modify the audit adjustments and/or the rate of reimbursement. The designee shall provide the facility with a written decision within thirty (30) days from the date of the review conference.

Appeals beyond the review conference shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. The facility shall file a written request for the hearing no later than fifteen (15) days after receipt of the review conference decision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 41, § 3.

40-8-22.
Protection of resources — Long-term care insurance partnership program.

The department of human services shall coordinate a program entitled the Rhode Island Partnership for Long-Term Care whereby private insurance and funds may be utilized to finance long-term care. The department shall seek appropriate amendments to its state plan for medical assistance under Title XIX, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., of the Social Security Act (Medicaid), or waivers of state plan requirements, to allow protection of resources and income pursuant to this section. The protection shall be provided, to the extent approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for any purchaser of a precertified, long-term-care policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed and shall last for the life of the purchaser. Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws, the resources of an individual, to the extent the resources are equal to the amount of qualifying long-term-care insurance benefits payments provided pursuant to a policy of long-term-care insurance precertified in accordance with department regulations and chapter 34.2 of title 27, shall not be considered by the department in a determination of: (1) His or her eligibility for Medicaid; (2) The amount of any Medicaid payment; or (3) In any subsequent recovery by the state of a payment for medical services. The precertified policies shall be known as “Medicaid qualifying long-term care partnership policies.”

The department shall count insurance benefit payments toward resource exclusion to the extent the payments: (1) Are for services covered under the state plan for medical assistance, including nursing home care, or formal services delivered to insureds in the community as part of a care plan; (2) Are for the lower of the actual charge or the amount paid by the insurance company; and (3) Are for services provided after the individual meets the coverage requirements for long-term-care benefits established by the department for this program. The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section and relating to determining eligibility of applicants for Medicaid and the coverage requirements for long-term-care benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 239, § 4.

40-8-23.
Contracting standards.

The director shall establish and maintain contracting standards for home health aide, homemaker, and nursing services. These standards shall apply to all such services purchased by the state from licensed providers. The contracting standards shall take into consideration industry guidelines published by national accreditation organizations such as the Joint Commission for the Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations and self-reporting activities by providers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 341, § 1.

40-8-24.
Less expensive alternative medications.

For pharmaceutical purchases eligible for reimbursement under the Medicaid state plan, the department shall encourage the substitution of generic drugs which are therapeutically equivalent and interchangeable with specific brand name drugs in accordance with §

21-31-16.1

and related regulations of the department of health, except in the event that a brand name is determined by the director to be less costly to the state than the equivalent generic. Calculation of comparative drug costs shall include consideration of the amount paid by the state to the pharmacy for a drug under the current retail pharmacy reimbursement formula, less any discounts or rebates, including those paid pursuant to federal Medicaid law during the previous calendar quarter, and inclusive of all dispensing fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 552, § 1.

40-8-25.
Nursing facility pharmaceutical waste reduction.

The department shall implement one or more methods to reduce the disposal of unused pharmaceuticals paid for by the medical assistance program for residents of nursing facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 17 of title 23. The department shall make a report to the permanent joint legislative committee on health care oversight on or before March 1, 2005, regarding the methods employed and any resulting cost savings anticipated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 465, § 1.

40-8-26.
Community health centers.

For the purposes of this section, the term community health centers refers to federally qualified health centers and rural health centers.

To support the ability of community health centers to provide high-quality medical care to patients, the executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) may adopt and implement an alternative payment methodology (APM) for determining a Medicaid per-visit reimbursement for community health centers that is compliant with the prospective payment system (PPS) provided for in the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Benefits Improvement and Protection Act of 2000. The following principles are to ensure that the APM PPS rate determination methodology is part of the executive office overall value purchasing approach. For community health centers that do not agree to the principles of reimbursement that reflect the APM PPS, EOHHS shall reimburse such community health centers at the federal PPS rate, as required per section 1902(bb)(3) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(bb)(3). For community health centers that are reimbursed at the federal PPS rate, subsections (d) through (f) of this section apply.

The APM PPS rate determination methodology will (i) Fairly recognize the reasonable costs of providing services. Recognized reasonable costs will be those appropriate for the organization, management, and direct provision of services and (ii) Provide assurances to the executive office that services are provided in an effective and efficient manner, consistent with industry standards. Except for demonstrated cause and at the discretion of the executive office, the maximum reimbursement rate for a service (e.g., medical, dental) provided by an individual community health center shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the median rate for all community health centers within Rhode Island.

Community health centers will cooperate fully and timely with reporting requirements established by the executive office.

Reimbursement rates established through this methodology shall be incorporated into the PPS reconciliation for services provided to Medicaid-eligible persons who are enrolled in a health plan on the date of service. Monthly payments by the executive office related to PPS for persons enrolled in a health plan shall be made directly to the community health centers.

Reimbursement rates established through this methodology shall be incorporated into the actuarially certified capitation rates paid to a health plan. The health plan shall be responsible for paying the full amount of the reimbursement rate to the community health center for each service eligible for reimbursement under the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Benefits Improvement and Protection Act of 2000. If the health plan has an alternative payment arrangement with the community health center the health plan may establish a PPS reconciliation process for eligible services and make monthly payments related to PPS for persons enrolled in the health plan on the date of service. The executive office will review, at least annually, the Medicaid reimbursement rates and reconciliation methodology used by the health plans for community health centers to ensure payments to each are made in compliance with the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Benefits Improvement and Protection Act of 2000.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 35, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

40-8-27.
Cooperation by providers.

Medicaid providers who employ individuals applying for benefits under any chapter of this title shall comply in a timely manner with requests made by the department for any documents describing employer-sponsored health insurance coverage or benefits the provider offers that are necessary to determine eligibility for the state’s premium assistance program pursuant to §

40-8.4-12

. Documents requested by the department may include, but are not limited to, certificates of coverage or a summary of benefits and employee obligations. Upon receiving notification that the department has determined that the employee is eligible for premium assistance under §

40-8.4-12

, the provider shall accept the enrollment of the employee and his or her family in the employer-based health insurance plan without regard to any seasonal enrollment restrictions, including open-enrollment restrictions, and/or the impact on the employee’s wages. Additionally, the Medicaid provider employing such persons shall not offer “pay in lieu of benefits.” Providers who do not comply with the provisions set forth in this section shall be subject to suspension as a participating Medicaid provider.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 7.

40-8-28.
Vendors doing business in the state of Rhode Island.

All vendors who do business with the state of Rhode Island in accordance with title 37 and who are also employers of Rhode Island medical assistance recipients shall make available in a timely manner to the department at the department’s request, documents describing the health insurance or health benefits offered by the vendor to the employee, including, but not limited to, a certificate of coverage or a summary of benefits and employee obligations for the purposes of, and only to the extent necessary to carry out the provisions of this section of the general laws. The employer shall accept the enrollment of the individual and/or the family in the employer-based health insurance plan without regard to any seasonal enrollment restrictions, including open-enrollment restrictions, without regard to the impact on the member’s wages. This is known as “pay in lieu of benefits.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 7.

40-8-29.
Selective contracting.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the department of human services is authorized to utilize selective contracting with prior general assembly approval for the purpose of purchasing for Medicaid recipients shared-living provider services, durable medical equipment and supplies, non-emergency transportation, and any other Medicaid services, when appropriate, in order to ensure that all service expenditures under this chapter have the maximum benefit of competition, and afford Rhode Islanders the overall best value, optimal quality, and the most cost-effective care possible. Beneficiaries will be limited to using the services/products of only those providers determined in a competitive bidding process to meet the standards for best quality, performance, and price set by the department in accordance with applicable federal and state laws.

For purposes of this section, “selective contracting” shall mean the process for choosing providers to serve Medicaid beneficiaries based on their ability to deliver the best quality products or services, at the best value or price.

To ensure all services allowable for Medicare reimbursement for beneficiaries who are dually eligible, selective contractors must be willing and able to accept Medicare.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 22, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 69, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 1.

40-8-30.
Suspension of participating providers.

Any approved medical assistance provider who declines to participate in contracting for benefits in any one of the department’s medical assistance programs, including, but not limited to, any and all managed care programs, may be suspended as a participating provider and denied participation in all state-operated medical assistance programs at the discretion of the department. Prior to suspension, a participating provider shall have the right to appeal such suspension to a state administrative hearing officer, in accordance with the rules of the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 22, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 69, § 5.

40-8-31.
Payments to out-of-state facilities.

Effective September 1, 2014, the executive office of health and human services shall require that any payment to an out-of-state provider from whom a Medicaid-eligible individual receives services must be a facility that applies for, and is approved to participate in, the Rhode Island Medicaid program. This excludes payments to out-of-state providers that do not participate in the Rhode Island Medicaid program but that are determined to be acceptable due to extenuating circumstances by the secretary of the executive office of health and human services. Furthermore, the department of children, youth and families is required to submit a bi-weekly report to the chair of the house committee on finance, the chair of the senate committee on finance, the house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor, and the office of management and budget detailing payments for placements to out-of-state facilities. The report should also indicate the entity recommending or ordering the placement, the types of services required, and reason for using an out-of-state facility. This change may require the adoption of new or amended rules, regulations and procedures.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 18, § 2.

40-8-32.
Support for certain patients of nursing facilities.

Definitions. For purposes of this section:

“Applied income” shall mean the amount of income a Medicaid beneficiary is required to contribute to the cost of his or her care.

“Authorized individual” shall mean a person who has authority over the income of a patient of a nursing facility, such as a person who has been given or has otherwise obtained authority over a patient’s bank account; has been named as or has rights as a joint account holder; or is a fiduciary as defined below.

“Costs of care” shall mean the costs of providing care to a patient of a nursing facility, including nursing care, personal care, meals, transportation, and any other costs, charges, and expenses incurred by a nursing facility in providing care to a patient. Costs of care shall not exceed the customary rate the nursing facility charges to a patient who pays for his or her care directly rather than through a governmental or other third-party payor.

“Fiduciary” shall mean a person to whom power or property has been formally entrusted for the benefit of another, such as an attorney-in-fact, legal guardian, trustee, or representative payee.

“Nursing facility” shall mean a nursing facility licensed under chapter 17 of title 23, that is a participating provider in the Rhode Island Medicaid program.

“Penalty period” means the period of Medicaid ineligibility imposed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c), as amended from time to time, on a person whose assets have been transferred for less than fair market value.

“Uncompensated care” — Care and services provided by a nursing facility to a Medicaid applicant without receiving compensation therefore from Medicaid, Medicare, the Medicaid applicant, or other source. The acceptance of any payment representing actual or estimated applied income shall not disqualify the care and services provided from qualifying as uncompensated care.

Penalty period resulting from transfer. Any transfer or assignment of assets resulting in the establishment or imposition of a penalty period shall create a debt that shall be due and owing to a nursing facility for the unpaid costs of care provided during the penalty period to a patient of that facility who has been subject to the penalty period. The amount of the debt established shall not exceed the fair market value of the transferred assets at the time of transfer that are the subject of the penalty period. A nursing facility may bring an action to collect a debt for the unpaid costs of care given to a patient who has been subject to a penalty period, against either the transferor or the transferee, or both. The provisions of this section shall not affect other rights or remedies of the parties.

Applied income. A nursing facility may provide written notice to a patient who is a Medicaid recipient and any authorized individual of that patient:

Of the amount of applied income due;

Of the recipient’s legal obligation to pay the applied income to the nursing facility; and

That the recipient’s failure to pay applied income due to a nursing facility not later than thirty (30) days after receiving notice from the nursing facility may result in a court action to recover the amount of applied income due.

A nursing facility that is owed applied income may, in addition to any other remedies authorized under law, bring a claim to recover the applied income against a patient and any authorized individual. If a court of competent jurisdiction determines, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that a defendant willfully failed to pay or withheld applied income due and owing to a nursing facility for more than thirty (30) days after receiving notice pursuant to subsection (c), the court may award the amount of the debt owed, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees to the nursing facility.

Effects. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit or otherwise diminish any other causes of action possessed by any such nursing facility. The death of the person receiving nursing facility care shall not nullify or otherwise affect the liability of the person or persons charged with the costs of care rendered or the applied income amount as referenced in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 13; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 30.